Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB657.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 319 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall require a national and state criminal background investigation for every:
(a) Applicant seeking an initial license issued by the board permitting the applicant to engage in a
profession authorized by the board;
(b) Applicant seeking to reinstate a license; and
(c) Kentucky credential holder who applies for authorization to engage in the practice of psychology
outside this Commonwealth in accordance with the IPC.
(2) The criminal background investigation under subsection (1) of this section shall be by means of a
fingerprint check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation
pursuant to the following requirements:
(a) The board shall require each applicant described in subsection (1) of this section to provide a
complete and legible set of fingerprints to the Department of Kentucky State Police for submission to
the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal background check after a state criminal
background check is conducted;
(b) The results of the national and state criminal background check shall be sent to the board for the
screening of applicants;
(c) The results of a national and state criminal background check shall not be distributed or otherwise
released by the board, except that the board:
1. Shall provide any applicant or credential holder the results of his or her national and state
criminal background check upon request; and
2. May introduce the results under seal as evidence in a legal proceeding that involves a
challenge to any disciplinary action taken by the board based in whole or in part on
information contained in the results; and
(d) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police or for the Federal Bureau of
Investigation background check shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the
request and conducting the background check.
(3) The board shall review the criminal background check results for every person described in subsection
(1)(c) of this section and determine whether the person is eligible to apply for the compact privilege to
practice outside the Commonwealth.
(4) The board may require a criminal background check for any credential holder who is the subject of a
grievance alleging misconduct by the credential holder as described in KRS 319.082.
(5) Unless otherwise required by law, the board shall not require a criminal background check solely for the
purpose of renewing a license.
(6) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement
this section.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 319A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall require a national and state criminal background investigation for every:
(a) Applicant seeking an initial license issued by the board permitting the applicant to engage in a
profession authorized by the board;
(b) Applicant seeking to reinstate a license; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Person licensed to engage in a profession authorized by the board who applies for authorization to
engage in the practice of occupational therapy outside this Commonwealth in accordance with the
occupational therapy licensure compact.
(2) The criminal background investigation under subsection (1) of this section shall be by means of a
fingerprint check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation
pursuant to the following requirements:
(a) The board shall require each applicant described in subsection (1) of this section to provide a
complete and legible set of fingerprints to the Department of Kentucky State Police for submission to
the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal background check after a state criminal
background check is conducted;
(b) The results of the national and state criminal background check shall be sent to the board for the
screening of applicants;
(c) The results of a national and state criminal background check shall not be distributed or otherwise
released by the board, except that the board:
1. Shall provide any applicant or credential holder the results of his or her national and state
criminal background check upon request; and
2. May introduce the results under seal as evidence in a legal proceeding that involves a
challenge to any disciplinary action taken by the board based in whole or in part on
information contained in the results; and
(d) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police or for the Federal Bureau of
Investigation background check shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the
request and conducting the background check.
(3) The board shall review the criminal background check results for every person described in subsection
(1)(c) of this section and determine whether the person is eligible to apply for the compact privilege to
practice outside this Commonwealth.
(4) The board may require a criminal background check for any person licensed to engage in a profession
authorized by the board who is the subject of a complaint alleging unprofessional conduct as described in
KRS 319A.190.
(5) Unless otherwise required by law, the board shall not require a criminal background check solely for the
purpose of renewing a license.
(6) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement
this section.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 334A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall require a national and state criminal background investigation for every:
(a) Applicant seeking an initial license issued by the board permitting the applicant to engage in a
profession authorized by the board;
(b) Applicant seeking to reinstate a license; and
(c) Person licensed to engage in a profession authorized by the board who applies for authorization to
engage in the practice of audiology or practice of speech pathology outside this Commonwealth in
accordance with the audiology and speech-language pathology interstate compact.
(2) The criminal background investigation under subsection (1) of this section shall be by means of a
fingerprint check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation
pursuant to the following requirements:
(a) The board shall require each applicant described in subsection (1) of this section to provide a
complete and legible set of fingerprints to the Department of Kentucky State Police for submission to
the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal background check after a state criminal
background check is conducted;
(b) The results of the national and state criminal background check shall be sent to the board for the
screening of applicants;

CHAPTER 6 3
(c) The results of a national and state criminal background check shall not be distributed or otherwise
released by the board, except that the board:
1. Shall provide any applicant or credential holder the results of his or her national and state
criminal background check upon request; and
2. May introduce the results under seal as evidence in a legal proceeding that involves a
challenge to any disciplinary action taken by the board based in whole or in part on
information contained in the results; and
(d) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police or for the Federal Bureau of
Investigation background check shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the
request and conducting the background check.
(3) The board shall review the criminal background check results for every person described in subsection
(1)(c) of this section and determine whether the person is eligible to apply for the compact privilege to
practice outside this Commonwealth.
(4) The board may require a criminal background check for any person licensed to engage in a profession
authorized by the board who is the subject of a complaint alleging prohibited conduct as described in KRS
334A.175.
(5) Unless otherwise required by law, the board shall not require a criminal background check solely for the
purpose of renewing a license.
(6) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement
this section.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335.010 TO 335.160 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall require a national and state criminal background investigation for every:
(a) Applicant seeking an initial license issued by the board permitting the applicant to engage in a
profession authorized by the board;
(b) Applicant seeking to reinstate a license; and
(c) Person licensed to engage in a profession authorized by the board who applies for authorization to
engage in the practice of social work outside this Commonwealth in accordance with the social work
licensure compact.
(2) The criminal background investigation under subsection (1) of this section shall be by means of a
fingerprint check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation,
pursuant to the following requirements:
(a) The board shall require each applicant described in subsection (1) of this section to provide a
complete and legible set of fingerprints to the Department of Kentucky State Police for submission to
the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal background check after a state criminal
background check is conducted;
(b) The results of the national and state criminal background check shall be sent to the board for the
screening of applicants;
(c) The results of a national and state criminal background check shall not be distributed or otherwise
released by the board, except that the board:
1. Shall provide any applicant or credential holder the results of his or her national and state
criminal background check upon request; and
2. May introduce the results under seal as evidence in a legal proceeding that involves a
challenge to any disciplinary action taken by the board based in whole or in part on
information contained in the results; and
(d) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police or for the Federal Bureau of
Investigation background check shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the
request and conducting the background check.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) The board shall review the criminal background check results for every person described in subsection
(1)(c) of this section and determine whether the person is eligible to apply for the compact privilege to
practice outside this Commonwealth.
(4) The board may require a criminal background check for any person licensed to engage in a profession
authorized by the board who is the subject of a grievance alleging prohibited conduct as described in KRS
335.150.
(5) Unless otherwise required by law, the board shall not require a criminal background check solely for the
purpose of renewing a license.
(6) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with this section and KRS Chapter
13A to implement this section.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 335.500 TO 335.599 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The board shall require a national and state criminal background investigation for every:
(a) Applicant seeking an initial license issued by the board permitting the applicant to engage in a
profession authorized by the board;
(b) Applicant seeking to reinstate a license; and
(c) Credential holder licensed to engage in a profession authorized by the board who applies for
authorization to engage in the practice of professional counseling outside this Commonwealth in
accordance with the counseling compact.
(2) The criminal background investigation under subsection (1) of this section shall be by means of a
fingerprint check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation
pursuant to the following requirements:
(a) The board shall require each applicant described in subsection (1) of this section to provide a
complete and legible set of fingerprints to the Department of Kentucky State Police for submission to
the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal background check after a state criminal
background check is conducted;
(b) The results of the national and state criminal background check shall be sent to the board for the
screening of applicants;
(c) The results of a national and state criminal background check shall not be distributed or otherwise
released by the board, except that the board:
1. Shall provide any applicant or credential holder the results of his or her national and state
criminal background check upon request; and
2. May introduce the results under seal as evidence in a legal proceeding that involves a
challenge to any disciplinary action taken by the board based in whole or in part on
information contained in the results; and
(d) Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police or for the Federal Bureau of
Investigation background check shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the
request and conducting the background check.
(3) The board shall review the criminal background check results for every person described in subsection
(1)(c) of this section and determine whether the person is eligible to apply for the compact privilege to
practice outside this Commonwealth.
(4) The board may require a criminal background check for any person licensed to engage in a profession
authorized by the board who is the subject of a complaint alleging prohibited conduct as described in KRS
335.540.
(5) Unless otherwise required by law, the board shall not require a criminal background check solely for the
purpose of renewing a license.
(6) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement
this section.
Signed by Governor March 27, 2026.

CHAPTER 6 5
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version